North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 5. Finance.

§ 59-501.
Form of contribution.

The contribution of a partner may be in cash, property, or services rendered, or a promissory note or other obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Creation of North Carolina’s Limited Liability Corporation Act,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 179 (1997).

§ 59-502.
Liability for contributions.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner is obligated to the limited partnership to perform any enforceable promise to contribute cash or property or to perform services, even if the partner is unable to perform because of death, disability or any other reason. If a partner does not make the required contribution of property or services, the partner is obligated at the option of the limited partnership to contribute cash equal to that portion of the agreed value of the stated contribution that has not been made. As used in this section, the term “agreed value” means an amount or other measure of value as (i) is provided in the partnership agreement, or (ii) if not provided in the partnership agreement, is required to be set forth in the written records required pursuant to

G.S. 59-106

.

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, the obligation of a partner to make a contribution or return money or other property paid or distributed in violation of this Article may be compromised only by consent of all the partners. Any such compromise, however, shall not affect the rights of a creditor whose claim arose prior to the date of the compromise.

No promise by a limited partner to contribute to the limited partnership is enforceable unless in a writing signed by the limited partner.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 23.

§ 59-503.
Sharing income, gain, loss, deduction or credit.

Income, gain, loss, deduction or credit of a limited partnership shall be allocated among the partners, and among classes of partners, in the manner provided in the partnership agreement. To the extent the partnership agreement does not provide for the allocation of items of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit, then those items shall be allocated on the basis of the agreed value of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have been received by the partnership and have not been returned. As used in this section, the term “agreed value” means an amount or other measure of value as (i) is provided in the partnership agreement, or (ii) if not provided in the partnership agreement, is required to be set forth in the written records required pursuant to

G.S. 59-106

.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 24.

§ 59-504.
Sharing of distributions.

Distributions of cash or other assets of a limited partnership shall be made among the partners, and among classes of partners, in the manner provided in the partnership agreement. To the extent the partnership agreement does not provide for the sharing of distributions among the partners, distributions shall be made among the partners on the basis of the agreed value of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have been received by the partnership and have not been returned. As used in this section, the term “agreed value” means an amount or other measure of value as (i) is provided in the partnership agreement, or (ii) if not provided in the partnership agreement, is required to be set forth in the written records required pursuant to

G.S. 59-106

.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 25.

§§ 59-505 through 59-600.

Reserved for future codification purposes.